Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.060

Accident fund—Warrants for judgments.

Every code city may create an accident fund upon which the clerk shall draw warrants for the full amount of any judgment including interest and costs against the city on account of personal injuries suffered by any person as shown by a transcript of the judgment duly certified to the clerk. Warrants issued for such purpose shall be in denominations not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars; they shall draw interest at the rate of six percent per annum, shall be numbered consecutively and be paid in the order of their issue.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.060.]